Utah statutes.
7-24-303.   Penalties.

(1)  A person who violates this chapter or who files materially false information with a registration or renewal under Section 7-24-201 is:

(a)  guilty of a class B misdemeanor except for a violation of:

(i)   Subsection 7-24-202(1)(e)(i), (ii), or (iii); or

(ii)  rules made under Subsection 7-24-301(2)(b); and

(b)  subject to revocation of a person's registration under this chapter.

(2)  Subject to Title 63G, Chapter 4, Administrative Procedures Act, if the department determines that a person is extending title loans in violation of this chapter, the department may:

(a)  revoke that person's registration under this chapter;

(b)  issue a cease and desist order from committing any further violations;

(c)  prohibit the person from continuing to extend title loans;

(d)  impose an administrative fine not to exceed $1,000 per violation, except that:

(i)  a fine imposed under Subsection 7-24-201(2)(e) shall comply with Subsection 7-24-201(2)(e); and

(ii)  the aggregate total of fines imposed under this chapter against a person in a calendar year may not exceed $30,000 for that calendar year; or

(e)  take any combination of actions listed under this Subsection (2).

(3)  A person is not subject to the penalties under this section for a violation of this chapter that was not willful or intentional, including a violation resulting from a clerical error.

